Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.250

Liability coverage of university personnel and students—Authorized—Scope.

The board of regents of the University of Washington, subject to such conditions and limitations and to the extent it may prescribe, is authorized to provide by purchase of insurance, by self-insurance, or by any combination of arrangements, indemnification of regents, officers, employees, agents, and students from liability on any action, claim, or proceeding instituted against them arising out of the performance or failure of performance, of duties for or employment with the university, or of responsibilities imposed by approved programs of the university, and to hold such persons harmless from any expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or payment of monetary judgments from such action, claim, or proceeding.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 1.]